District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.08

Basic business license application fees; renewal fees.

(a)

(1)

The Center shall collect a fee of $70 for each basic business license it issues, plus $25 for each endorsement added to the basic business license.

(2)

The entire basic business license application fee shall be deposited in the Basic Business License Fund established by § 47-2851.13.

(b)

(1)

The Center shall collect a fee of $70 on each renewal license it issues, plus $25 for each endorsement added to the basic business license.

(2)

The entire application renewal fee shall be deposited in the Basic Business License Fund established by § 47-2851.13.

(c)

The fees assessed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any fees required by law or by statute for the issuance of license endorsements.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall be read as reassigning license endorsement fees to the General Fund of the District of Columbia where the Mayor has determined or where the law requires that those fees should go to a dedicated fund to benefit a particular agency or department of the District government.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(b), (h), 46 DCR 3142
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307,§ 1607, 49 DCR 11664
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(j), 50 DCR 6913
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(l)(6), 52 DCR 2638
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 2007(c), 55 DCR 7598
1981 Ed., § 47-2851.8.
D.C. Law 14-307 rewrote subsec. (a)(1) which had read as follows: “(a)(1) The Center shall collect a fee of $25 for each master business license it issues, plus $5 for each endorsement added to the master business license.”
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “basic” for “master” wherever appearing; in subsecs. (a)(2) and (b)(2), substituted “Basic” for “Master”; in subsec. (c), deleted “inspected or uninspected” preceding “license endorsements”; and in subsec. (d), substituted “General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “general fund” and “government” for “Government”.
D.C. Law 15-354, in the section heading and subsecs. (a)(2) and (b)(2), validated previously made technical corrections.
D.C. Law 17-219 rewrote subsecs. (a)(1) and (b)(1).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1607 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1607 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1607 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August